California statutes. Water Code
The board shall offer to lease to the Department of Fish and Game, or to an appropriate public resource protection or public conservation agency or organization approved by the Department of Fish and Game and the board, any lands it acquires as replacement habitat as mitigation for adverse environmental impacts of its projects. The lease agreement shall ensure that these lands are managed to provide the mitigation for which they were acquired and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for funding management of those lands. Funds for management of those lands may include, but are not limited to, funds appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Water Resources, the Reclamation Board, or the Department of Fish and Game, and funds available from local entities. The lease agreement shall reserve the authority of the board to carry out necessary flood control activities and mitigate adverse environmental impacts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 230.1.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.5.

(a) (1) The board shall adopt regulations relating to evidentiary hearings pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The board shall hold an evidentiary hearing for any matter that requires the issuance of a permit if the proposed work may significantly affect any element of the State Plan of Flood Control or if a formal protest against that permit has been lodged.

(3) The board may, by regulation, define types of encroachments that will not significantly affect any element of the State Plan of Flood Control. Evidentiary hearings are not required for uncontested
 applications for those defined encroachments unless, in the judgment of the executive officer, there is a reasonable possibility that the project will have a significant effect on an adopted plan of flood control.

(4) The board may delegate approval of permits for encroachments that will not significantly affect any element of the State Plan of Flood Control to the executive officer.

(5) The board is not required to hold an evidentiary hearing before making a decision relating to general flood protection policy or planning.

(b) The board may take an action pursuant to Section 8560 only after allowing for public comment.

(c) The board shall, in any evidentiary hearing, consider all of the following, as applicable, for the purpose of taking any action
 pursuant to Section 8560:

(1) Evidence that the board admits into its record from any party, state or local public agency, or nongovernmental organization with expertise in flood or flood plain management.

(2) The best available science that relates to the scientific issues presented by the executive officer, legal counsel, the department, or other parties that raise credible scientific issues.

(3) Effects of the proposed decision on the entire State Plan of Flood Control.

(4) Effects of reasonably projected future events, including, but not limited to, changes in hydrology, climate, and development within the applicable watershed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 15.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8611.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), prior to construction at a site of a flood control, channel clearance, or bank stabilization project, the board, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Game, shall prepare and adopt a mitigation plan which shall be implemented as part of the project. A mitigation plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the actions that the board proposes to take to ensure that the project will meet all mitigation standards required by law with the objective of ensuring that the project causes no net loss of riparian, fishery, or wildlife habitat.

(2) A designation of the agency or agencies responsible for implementing and maintaining each mitigation element of the plan.

(3) A schedule for implementation of the mitigation ensuring that the mitigation measures will be accomplished prior to, or concurrent with, construction of the project, unless the board determines that to do so would be impracticable.

(4) A financing plan for the mitigation identifying the source or sources of funds for the mitigation, the share of mitigation costs attributable to each source, and a schedule of when the funds are to be provided.

The plan may take into consideration the environmental benefits of restoring, maintaining, or increasing the sustainable diversity of native species and habitat which may result from the project, if these benefits have been approved by the Department of Fish and Game. The Department of Fish and Game may submit a review of the plan and its recommendations to the board for inclusion in the plan. 

(b) No mitigation plan is required when the board is responding to an emergency where no mitigation is required.

(c) For any project authorized pursuant to Section 12668, the agreement set forth in subdivision (a) shall provide for the mitigation of the project with the objective of providing a net long-term enhancement of the riparian habitat and fishery in the project area. The degree of net enhancement required for each phase or part of the project shall not be so great as to cause the project to be infeasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1488, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8612.

(a) On or before December 31, 2008, the department shall prepare, and the board shall adopt, a schedule for mapping areas at risk of flooding in the Sacramento River and San Joaquin River drainage.

(b) The department shall update the schedule annually and shall present the updated schedule to the board for adoption on or before December 31 of each year. The update shall include the status of mapping in progress and an estimated time of completion. The schedule shall be based on the present and expected future risk of flooding and associated consequences.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8613.

(a) The board or the department may establish a program of mitigation banking for the activities of the board or the department under this part and for the benefit of local districts in the discharge of their flood control responsibilities under this part and the State Water Resources Law of 1945 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of Part 6 of Division 6).

(b) For the purposes of carrying out subdivision (a), the board or the department, in consultation with all appropriate state, local, and federal agencies with jurisdiction over environmental protection that are authorized to regulate and impose requirements upon the flood control work performed under this part or the State Water Resources Law of 1945 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of Part 6 of Division 6), may establish a system of mitigation banking by which mitigation credits may be acquired in advance for flood control work to be performed by the board, the department, or a local agency authorized to operate and maintain facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cooperation With the United States [8615. - 8623.]

8615.

The board may, in cooperation with the United States, adopt and carry out any plan or plans or project of flood control in the Sacramento or San Joaquin River Valleys or on or near the Sacramento River or the San Joaquin River or their tributaries and may exercise jurisdiction and authority in connection with such plans or projects inside or outside the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.

It is the intent of this article to enlarge and extend the power, jurisdiction and authority of the board outside the drainage district to the extent set forth but not in any degree to limit, restrict or abridge any of the powers, jurisdiction or authority of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8617.

The board may give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of Defense of the United States that the state will do all of the following:

(a) Provide, without cost to the United States, all lands, easements, and rights-of-way necessary for the construction of the project under the adopted flood control plan, except as otherwise provided in that certain act passed by the Congress of the United States, approved June 22, 1936, and entitled “An act authorizing the construction of certain public works on rivers and harbors for flood control and other purposes” (Public Law No. 738, Seventy-fourth Congress).

(b) Hold and save the United States free from damage due to the construction works.

(c) Maintain and operate all the works after completion in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Secretary of Defense.

(d) Promise, agree, do, or perform any or all other things required or necessary under the provisions of the act of Congress approved June 22, 1936, or any acts amending or adding to that act, now or hereafter adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 450.)
-------------------------------------------

8617.1.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of Chapters 1 and 3 (commencing with Sections 12570 and 12800, respectively) of Part 6 of Division 6, the board may take any action and expend any available funds for the purpose of co-operating with the United States in carrying out the project for flood protection on the Sacramento River, as provided for and required under the provision of the act of Congress. Public Law 86-645, 86th Congress, approved July 14, 1960. Any reallocation of funds by the department for purposes described in this section shall be subject to the provisions of Section 12828. Prior to any appropriation of funds for the purposes described in this section, the board shall investigate and report to the Governor and Legislature on methods of feasible recovery from the beneficiaries of the work to be accomplished of that portion of the total nonfederal contribution in excess of costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way and the liabilities which may be incurred due to the construction, operation, and maintenance of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2188.)
-------------------------------------------

8617.5.

(a) In connection with any work done on projects authorized by the board in the repair or reconstruction of levees or other flood control works completed before June 30, 1957, the board may provide for and pay the cost of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of improvements, structures, or utilities that have actually existed and been in use for over 20 years, which has been rendered necessary by the work, unless payment would be contrary to any written authorization or agreement under which the improvement, structure, or utility was constructed or maintained.

(b) This section shall not apply to the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of improvements, structures, or utilities if the work has been financed, in whole or in part, with funds under the Flood Relief Law of 1956 (former Article 6 (commencing with Section 54150) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) or Public Law 81-875.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 670.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8618.

All political subdivisions, agencies of the State, and municipal and quasi-municipal corporations may make agreements with the board obligating themselves to do or perform those things which are required of the State, political subdivisions thereof, or other local agencies by the act of Congress approved June 22, 1936, or any acts amending or adding to it, now or hereafter adopted.

When an elimination, modification, or alteration of any authorized plan of flood control is made at the request of a political subdivision, agency of the State, or municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, the political subdivision, agency of the State, or municipal or quasi-municipal corporation may, in agreements made pursuant to this section, assume responsibility for all claims of damage or liability made against the State and its agencies or the United States and arising from the requested elimination, modification, or alteration of the authorized plan of flood control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 642.)
-------------------------------------------

8619.

In case any land, right of way, or easement is needed and is required to be provided free of cost to the State or the United States for any work of channel excavation, enlargement, rectification or control, or for the construction of any weir, which is a part of the plan and is to be done or constructed in whole or in part by the United States or by the State, the board may:

(a) Acquire the land, right of way, or easement and cause it to be conveyed to the United States or to the State free of cost.

(b) Cause the land, right of way, or easement to be condemned for the use and in the name of the United States or the State in the manner provided by the laws of this State or of the United States.

(c) Pay the cost and expense of acquiring the land, right of way, or easement out of the funds of any assessment by the board applicable thereto.

(d) If the land, right of way, or easement has been already acquired by the board in the name of the drainage district, the board may cause it to be conveyed by the district to the United States or to the State free of cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8620.

Whenever any work to be done by the board of the drainage district under any of the provisions of this part is such that it can be so done in connection with work of public improvement of rivers and harbors authorized by the United States as to bring it within the provisions of Section 4 of the United States River and Harbor Act, approved March 4, 1915, authorizing the receipt by the United States agencies of funds to be contributed for expenditures in connection with funds appropriated by the United States for such work, the funds under the control of the board and available for such work may be contributed by the board to the United States under the provisions of the act in order that the work may be done in the manner contemplated in the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8621.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of Chapters 1 and 3 of Part 6 of Division 6, the board, with the approval of the Department of Finance, may, when a saving to the State will result, in lieu of acquiring all or any portion of the lands, easements, or rights of way, in connection with a flood control project, execute a substitute plan which includes provision for the State to construct works or contribute to the United States a portion of the construction cost of the flood control project when such works to be constructed by the board or the changes in the design of the project are made which, while resulting in new or added state expenditures for construction, will reduce the costs of the lands, easements or rights of way which otherwise might be required. Any funds heretofore or hereafter appropriated or allocated to the board for the acquisition of lands, easements, or rights of way may be used for the purposes specified in this section.

In carrying out the provisions of this section, the board may negotiate with the United States and adopt on behalf of the State, any necessary revision of a project authorized by Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 6, but no money shall be expended pursuant to this section to meet the requirements of the United States for local cooperation in connection with such authorized project unless the United States agrees to accept the substitute plan as meeting the requirements for local cooperation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1048.)
-------------------------------------------

8622.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of Chapters 1 and 3 (commencing with Sections 12570 and 12800 respectively) of Part 6 of Division 6, the board may undertake immediate construction or reconstruction of a portion of a project at state expense, if the board determines that it is urgent to immediately construct or reconstruct a portion of an authorized flood control project because of damages resulting from the 1955–56 floods. Any funds heretofore or hereafter appropriated or allocated to the board for the acquisition of lands, easements, and rights of way may be used for the purposes specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1956, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

8623.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800) of Part 6 of Division 6, the board may plan, design, and construct flood relief structures or weirs and other structures or facilities essential for their proper functioning in the vicinity of the Sacramento River between Big Chico Creek and the north boundary of Glenn County Levee District No. 3, as needed to assure proper division of flood flows between the river and adjacent overflow areas and to preserve the integrity of the Sacramento River Flood Control Project. No revetment of the river bank may be installed pursuant to this section except to the extent necessary to assure the proper division of flood flows as described in this section. If any revetment is required under this section, it shall be accomplished by the palisades method, unless the department finds that method is not feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1090, Sec. 2.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Levees [8630. - 8647.]

8630.

As used in this article the term “levee” means any levee within the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8631.

The board may promote the construction, completion, maintenance and repair of levees along all rivers, streams, overflow channels, basins and by-passes where, in the opinion of the board, the levees are insufficient or necessary for the purpose of the plans for flood control to be carried out by the board under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8632.

Whenever any levee is in the opinion of the board insufficient or necessary for flood control, the board shall publish notice to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8633.

The published notice shall state that the levee is insufficient or necessary, that it is the intention of the board to construct, repair or complete the levee and pay the cost out of an assessment levied or to be levied and assessed upon the lands within the drainage district directly or indirectly benefited by the levee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8634.

The notice shall be signed in the name of the board by its president and secretary and shall be published once a week for three weeks in some newspaper published in the county wherein the levee or the greater part of it is situated or is to be constructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8635.

The giving of the notice by publication shall be complete on the twenty-first day after the first publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8636.

Any landowner, reclamation district, drainage district, levee district, municipal corporation or other organization or association authorized by law to construct, repair or complete a levee shall have 30 days after completion of the giving of notice by publication within which to apply to the board for leave to construct, repair or complete the levee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8637.

The application shall be in writing and signed by the applicants or their respective executors, administrators, guardians, trustees or duly constituted and authorized officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8638.

The application shall be filed in the office of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8639.

When an application is filed within the required 30 days, the applicants shall have 60 days after filing the application, or any further time that the board allows, within which to do the following:

(a) Present to the board plans and specifications.

(b) Obtain the board’s approval of plans and specifications.

(c) Commence the work of repair, construction or completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8640.

The application for leave to construct, repair or complete a levee shall designate the name and post-office address of at least one and not more than three of the applicants as the person or persons to whom any notice or communication may be addressed by the board in the matter of the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8641.

In case there are two or more applications filed in the office of the board within the required 30 days the board may determine which of such applications shall be recognized and may reject the others.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8642.

Any levee constructed or work done by the applicants, pursuant to notice from the board and according to plans and specifications approved by the board, shall be considered as constructed or done with the permission of the board within the meaning of Article 1 of Chapter 8 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8643.

If the application is not filed in the office of the board within 30 days after completion of the giving of notice by publication, or if the applicants fail to present to the board and obtain its approval of the plans and specifications and to commence the work within 60 days after filing the application or any further time the board may allow, or fail to complete the work with reasonable diligence, the board may proceed with the construction, repair or completion of the work, and pay the cost by assessment upon the lands within the drainage district directly or indirectly benefited by the levee according to the benefits, as provided for in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8644.

The assessment may be either an assessment specially levied and assessed for that purpose, or any assessment levied and assessed by the board and applicable to the payment of such work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8645.

Notwithstanding anything in this article the board may determine a case of emergency exists requiring immediate action to preserve life or property or to protect or preserve the safety of any levee along any river, stream, overflow channel, basin or by-pass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8646.

The board may do the necesssary work immediately for the protection or preservation of the levee, without giving the notice provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8647.

The board may pay the cost, including any damage that may result from the performance of the work, by an assessment to be levied and assessed as provided in this article or out of the funds of any assessment available for that purpose under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Lease and Sale of Property [8655. - 8679.]

8655.

The board may determine that any land acquired by the drainage district and deeded to the State for any right of way for river improvement work or flood control is in excess of what is or will be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8656.

The Department of General Services upon request of the board may sell the excess land at a purchase price determined upon by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8657.

The Department of General Services when authorized by the board may execute and deliver in the name and on behalf of the state, a conveyance of such land to the purchaser upon payment of the purchase price to the State Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8658.

The purchase price when paid to the State Treasurer shall be credited to such fund as the board directs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8659.

All or any part of any land, right-of-way or easement required for any work of channel excavation, enlargement, rectification or control or for any site for the construction of any weir, forming part of or incidental to any plan approved by the state for flood control in the Sacramento or San Joaquin Valleys, which land, right-of-way or easement or weir site has been or may hereafter be acquired by the state, may, at the request of the board and with the approval of the Department of General Services, be sold to the drainage district at a purchase price equal to the cost thereof to the state, to be determined by the Department of General Services, and upon payment to the state of the purchase price, may be conveyed to the drainage district, or to the United States, as may be requested by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8660.

The Department of General Services may execute and deliver pursuant to the next preceding section a conveyance in the name and on behalf of the state upon payment to the State Treasurer of the purchase price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8661.

The purchase price, when paid to the State Treasurer, shall be credited back to the appropriation out of which the cost of acquiring the land, right of way, easement or weir site was paid by the State, and shall be available for the same purposes for which such appropriation was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8662.

Any lease of property of the drainage district for the production of oil, gas or other hydrocarbons may be made upon such consideration or for such royalties as may be authorized by the board subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8663.

The board, before ordering the lease of any property pursuant to the next preceding section, shall, in a regular open meeting, adopt a resolution declaring their intention to lease the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.

The resolution shall:

(a) Describe the property proposed to be leased in such manner as to identify it.

(b) Specify the minimum rental or royalty.

(c) Specify terms upon which the property will be leased.

(d) Fix time not less than three weeks thereafter for a public meeting of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8665.

The meeting shall be held at the board’s regular place of meeting, at which meeting sealed proposals to lease the property will be received and considered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8666.

Notice of the adoption of the resolution and of the time and place for holding the meeting shall be given by publishing a notice containing the resolution not less than once a week for three successive weeks before the meeting, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the drainage district or any part thereof is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8667.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the board, all sealed proposals which have been received shall, in public session, be opened, examined and declared by the board, and of the proposals submitted which conform to all terms and conditions specified in the resolution, and which are made by responsible bidders, the one which is the highest shall be accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8668.

Upon a call for oral bidding, at the session, any person may offer to lease the property upon the terms and conditions specified in the resolution for a rental or royalty exceeding by at least 5 per cent the highest of the written proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8669.

The highest of any of the oral bids made by a responsible person shall be finally accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8670.

The board may make a final acceptance either at the same session or at any adjourned session of the same meeting held within the 10 days next following.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8671.

The board may, at such session, if it deems the action to be for the best public interest, reject any and all bids either written or oral, and withdraw the property from lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8672.

The resolution of acceptance of any bid shall provide for the proper execution of a lease upon behalf of the drainage district, and delivery of the lease upon performance and compliance by the lessee of all the terms and conditions of his contract which are to be performed concurrently with the execution of the lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8673.

The board, in lieu of leasing property as provided in this article, if it deems such action to be for the best public interest, may lease lands for the production of oil, gas and other hydrocarbon substances therefrom jointly with the lands of an adjoining landowner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8674.

No joint lease shall be entered into until after adoption of a resolution and publication of notice as provided in this article and after a public meeting of the board at which protests, if any, shall be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8675.

A joint lease shall provide for the payment of a minimum royalty to the drainage district of not less than 15 per cent of the value of the oil, gas or other hydrocarbon substances produced from the property owned by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8676.

Whenever the board has acquired or shall in the future acquire title in fee to any land in the name and in behalf of the district and whenever, in the judgment of the board, the purposes of the district will be satisfied by the retention of an easement or other interest in the land less than the title in fee thereto, the board shall take all steps necessary to sell said land reserving to said district the easement or other interest acquired for the purposes of the district. Conveyances of such land or interest therein owned by the district shall be executed by the officers of the board authorized by the board and shall be approved by the Director of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8677.

All oil, gas, oil shale, coal, phosphate, sodium, gold, silver, and all other mineral deposits in the land are reserved to the State and shall be reserved from sale except on a rental and royalty basis. A purchaser of any of the land shall acquire no right, title, or interest in or to such deposit. The right of such purchaser shall be subject to the reservation of all oil, gas, oil shale, coal, phosphate, sodium, gold, silver, and all other mineral deposits, and to the conditions and limitations prescribed by law providing for the State and persons authorized by it to prospect for, mine, and remove such deposits, and to occupy and use so much of the surface of the land as may be required for all purposes reasonably extending to the mining and removal of such deposits therefrom. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any compromise agreement entered into with respect to such land, nor to grants of such land to the United States when such grants are authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 489.)
-------------------------------------------

8678.

Every lease, rental, letting or license to use real property owned in fee by the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District, which is executed by the board shall be subject to the approval of the Director of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8679.

Revenues, rents, and proceeds from sale of crops from lands under control of the board shall be paid into the State Treasury as follows:

(a) To the current appropriation for the support of the board as an abatement of the cost of producing or disposing of crops in such amounts as may be approved by the Department of Finance.

(b) The balance thereof to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 197.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Cooperation Between Board and Department of Water Resources [8685. - 8698.]

8685.

The board may determine that any construction, repair work, maintenance, or operation of flood control works or structures shall be done by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8686.

The plans and specifications for the work shall be prepared and approved by the board and delivered to the department with a request that the work be done by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8687.

The work shall be done under the sole charge and direct control of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8688.

The cost and expenses incurred by the department in connection with work under this article is a legal charge against the drainage district and shall be paid out of any applicable assessment or fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8689.

Any contract let by the department for any work under this article shall be approved by the board before becoming effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8690.

Any cash, bond, check or other security forfeited by any bidder or contractor for failure to enter into or to perform any contract for doing work under this article shall be forfeited to and recovered by the board for the use of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8691.

Any forfeiture, as soon as received or recovered, shall be paid to the State Treasurer and placed to the credit of the assessment out of which the cost of the work is to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8692.

The board may furnish to the department any of its dredges, machines, appliances, tools, apparatus or other property which may be necessary or convenient for performing work delegated to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8693.

The department shall advise and assist the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8694.

The department shall be reimbursed by the board for any necessary expenses incurred by it under the direction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8695.

The department may at its option appoint the chief engineer of the board to act also as its assistant in the performance of the duties required of it by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8696.

The compensation of the chief engineer while acting also as assistant to the department shall be apportioned as may be agreed upon between the board and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8697.

All maps, records and engineering data prepared or obtained by the department for the use of the board shall be deposited in the office of the board and remain part of its records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8698.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the board shall cooperate with the department in all matters of mutual concern to the fullest extent practicable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Enforcement of Unauthorized Activities and Encroachments [8700. - 8709.]

8700.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or public agency to interfere with, obstruct the performance, maintenance, or operation of, or otherwise take actions that may adversely affect facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control, designated floodways, or streams that are regulated by the board.

(b) The board, executive officer, department, and local agencies that operate and maintain facilities and works on behalf of the board shall have the authority, as set forth in this article, to take administrative or civil enforcement actions to abate and remedy any interference or potential interference proscribed by subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   (SB 753)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8701.

(a) If the board or the executive officer determines that any person or public agency has undertaken, is threatening to undertake, or maintains any encroachment, flood system improvement, or activity in violation of this part, the board or the executive officer may issue a notice of violation to the person or public agency responsible for the encroachment, flood system improvement, or activity.

(b) The department or a local agency may issue a notice of violation pursuant to subdivision (a) for facilities within the board’s jurisdiction that the department or local agency operates and maintains if the board delegates the agency that authority. This subdivision shall not require the department or local
 agency to accept that delegation of authority.

(c) A notice of violation shall include all of the following:
